sl-SI: Funkcionalnost traku: Nastavljiva zanka; Večnamenski nosilec in trak za raztezanje; Trak za raztezanje z zankami; Nosilec za blazino; Pripomoček za raztezanje; Drugo
sk-SK: Funkcia popruhu: Nastaviteľný popruh; Dvojúčelový nosič a strečing; Slučkový strečingový popruh; Nosič na podložku; Pomôcka na strečing; Iné
ja: ストラップ機能: 調整可能スリング; デュアルパーパス (キャリーおよびストレッチ); ループ付きストレッチストラップ; マットキャリア; ストレッチエイド; その他
zh-TW: 綁帶功能: 可調式背帶; 攜帶與伸展雙用途; 環狀伸展帶; 瑜珈墊背帶; 伸展輔助; 其他
lt-LT: Diržo funkcionalumas: Reguliuojamas diržas; Dvejopos paskirties (nešimui ir tempimui); Tempimo diržas su kilpomis; Kilimėlio laikiklis; Tempimo pagalba; Kita
ko: 스트랩 기능: 길이 조절형 슬링; 캐리어 및 스트레칭 겸용; 루프형 스트레칭 스트랩; 매트 캐리어; 스트레치 보조기구; 기타
hu: Pánt funkcionalitása: Állítható heveder; Kettős célú hordozó és nyújtó; Hurkos nyújtóheveder; Szőnyeghordozó; Nyújtást segítő; Egyéb
nb: Stroppfunksjonalitet: Justerbar slynge; Kombinert bære- og tøyestropp; Tøyestropp med løkker; Mattebærer; Tøyehjelp; Annet
zh-CN: 背带功能: 可调节挂绳; 搬运与拉伸两用; 环形拉伸带; 垫子收纳带; 拉伸辅助; 其他
pl: Funkcjonalność paska: Regulowana chusta; Wielofunkcyjny pasek do noszenia maty i rozciągania; Pasek do rozciągania z pętlami; Uchwyt do przenoszenia maty; Pomoc przy rozciąganiu; Inne
vi: Chức năng dây đeo: Đai đeo tùy chỉnh; Đai xách và kéo giãn đa năng; Đai kéo giãn dạng vòng; Đai xách thảm; Đai hỗ trợ kéo giãn; Khác
fr: Fonction de la sangle: Sangle réglable; Sangle de transport et d'étirement à double usage; Sangle d'étirement à boucles; Sangle de transport pour tapis; Aide à l'étirement; Autre
tr: Kayış işlevselliği: Ayarlanabilir askı; Çift amaçlı taşıyıcı ve esneme kayışı; Halkalı esneme kayışı; Mat taşıyıcı; Esneme yardımcısı; Diğer
ro-RO: Funcționalitatea curelei: Curea ajustabilă; Transport și întindere (cu dublu scop); Curea de întindere cu bucle; Suport pentru saltea; Ajutor pentru întindere; Altele
de: Gurtfunktion: Verstellbare Schlinge; Trage- und Dehngurt; Dehngurt mit Schlaufen; Mattengurt; Dehnhilfe; Andere
hr-HR: Funkcionalnost remena: Prilagodljivi remen; Za nošenje i rastezanje (dvostruka namjena); Traka za rastezanje s petljama; Remen za nošenje prostirke; Pomagalo za rastezanje; Ostalo
it: Funzionalità della cinghia: Cinghia regolabile; Doppio uso trasporto e stretching; Cinghia da stretching ad anello; Portatappetino; Aiuto per lo stretching; Altro
fi: Hihnan toiminnallisuus: Säädettävä hihna; Kaksikäyttöinen kanto- ja venytyshihna; Lenkillinen venytyshihna; Maton kantohihna; Venytysapu; Muu
es: Funcionalidad de la correa: Correa ajustable; Transporte y estiramiento de doble propósito; Correa de estiramiento con bucles; Soporte para colchoneta; Ayuda para estiramiento; Otro
nl: Band functionaliteit: Verstelbare draagband; Draagband en rekhulp; Rekband met lussen; Mattendraagband; Rekhulp; Overig
th: ฟังก์ชันสายรัด: สายสะพายปรับระดับได้; สายสะพายและสายยืด (อเนกประสงค์); สายยืดแบบมีห่วง; สายสะพายเสื่อ; สายช่วยยืดเหยียด; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tira funcionalidade: Alça ajustável; Transporte e alongamento de uso duplo; Faixa de alongamento com laços; Transporte de tapete; Auxiliar de alongamento; Outro
cs: Funkce popruhu: Nastavitelný popruh; Dvojúčelový (nošení a protahování); Protahovací popruh se smyčkami; Popruh na podložku; Pomůcka pro protahování; Jiné
el: Λειτουργικότητα ιμάντα: Ρυθμιζόμενος ιμάντας μεταφοράς; Διπλής χρήσης: Μεταφορά και διατάσεις; Ιμάντας διατάσεων με θηλιές; Ιμάντας μεταφοράς στρώματος; Βοήθημα διατάσεων; Άλλο
bg-BG: Функционалност на каишката: Регулируем ремък; Двойно предназначение за носене и разтягане; Каишка за разтягане с примки; Чанта/каишка за постелка; Помощно средство за разтягане; Друго
pt-PT: Funcionalidade da correia: Alça ajustável; Transporte de dupla finalidade e extensão; Faixa de alongamento com argola; Transporte de tapete; Auxílio de alongamento; Outro
en: Strap functionality: Adjustable Sling; Dual-Purpose Carrier and Stretch; Looped Stretching Strap; Mat Carrier; Stretch Aid; Other
da: Remfunktion: Justerbar slynge; Bære- og strækrem med to formål; Strækrem med løkker; Måttebærer; Strækhjælp; Andet
ru: Функциональность ремня: Регулируемый ремень; Двойного назначения (переноска и растяжка); Ремень для растяжки с петлями; Для переноски коврика; Вспомогательный ремень для растяжки; Другое
sv: Remfunktion: Justerbar bärrem; Kombinerad bärrem och stretch; Stretchband med öglor; Mattbärare; Stretchhjälpmedel; Övrigt